District of Columbia statutes.
38-1951

Repealed

Masculine pronoun construed to include female employees.

Repealed.

June 12, 1940, 54 Stat. 350, ch. 342, § 6
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 17, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1016.
1973 Ed., § 31-637.